Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 11 Local Police And Fire Pension And Relief Funds
Subchapter 8
— Firemen's Relief and Pension Funds

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-821, 24-11-823, and 24-11-824 may not apply to §§ 24-11-822, 24-11-825 — 24-11-827, 24-11-829, and 24-11-830, which were enacted subsequently.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-11-801 to 24-11-830 may not apply to §§ 24-11-831 and 24-11-832 which were enacted subsequently.

Cross References.

Additional insurance premium tax allocated to Firemen's Relief and Pension Fund, §§ 26-57-610, 26-57-611.

Preambles.

Acts 1941, No. 14 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, at the general election held November 5, 1940, the people of the State of Arkansas adopted Amendment No. 31 to the Constitution of the State of Arkansas authorizing cities of the first and second class to vote a tax on the assessed value of real and personal property within such city not to exceed one (1) mill on the dollar to pay pensions to retired firemen and pensions to the widows and minor children of deceased firemen, and widows and minor children of deceased retired firemen, in such manner as shall be provided by law;

“Therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1927, No. 214, § 2: Effective on passage.

Acts 1939, No. 84, § 2: Feb. 15, 1939.

Acts 1941, No. 14, § 5: Approved Jan. 30, 1941. Emergency clause provided: “The method of levying a tax on the real and personal property of cities for the benefit of the Firemen's Pension and Relief Fund, under Act No. 30 of the Acts of the Arkansas General Assembly for the year 1939, having been declared unconstitutional by the Supreme Court of the State of Arkansas, it is ascertained and declared to be a fact that in many cities of this state the Firemen's Pension and Relief Fund is depleted; that in such cities there are many disabled and retired firemen, and widow and minor children of deceased firemen and widows and minor children of deceased retired firemen, without any other source of income, and in need of the assistance that was contemplated under Act No. 30 of the Acts of 1939; that the existing laws make no provision for the respective municipalities to provide for pensions for such persons; that the passage of this act will enable such municipalities to vote on the question of a tax levy for firemen retirement salaries and pensions, and pensions to the widows and minor children of deceased firemen and widows and minor children of deceased retired firemen; therefore, in order to protect the public peace, health and safety of the citizenship of such municipalities, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1943, No. 167, § 4: Mar. 4, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “In order to conserve, safeguard and make more equitable the proper disposition of the funds, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, it shall be in effect and full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1947, No. 187, § 2: Mar. 6, 1947. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, numerous cities and towns in Arkansas do not have sufficient moneys in the firemen's relief and pension fund to adequately provide for the payment of benefits and/or pensions to firemen injured or killed in the line of duty but do have sufficient funds to purchase insurance covering such contingencies; therefore, this act being necessary for the further protection of firemen of cities and towns in Arkansas and for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1949, No. 488, § 3: Mar. 30, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that the work of firemen is essential to the public peace, health and safety. Because of the urgent need for increased benefits to firemen or their survivors, and this Act being necessary, therefore, for preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1951, No. 82, § 7: Feb. 15, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas it is necessary to provide additional funds for the Firemen's Relief and Pension Fund, and to require payments by those firemen who desire to receive the benefits of said fund; therefore, this act being necessary for the further protection of firemen of cities and towns in Arkansas and for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1953, No. 68, § 3: Feb. 16, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “In order to conserve, safeguard and make more equitable the proper disposition of the funds, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, it shall be in effect and full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1955, No. 76, § 2: Feb. 17, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that the work of firemen is essential to the public peace, health and safety. Because of the urgent need for monthly pensions for firemen who become physically or mentally disabled, and this Act being necessary, therefore, for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1955, No. 77, § 3: Feb. 17, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that the work of firemen is essential to the public peace, health and safety, and it is further found that a great deal of confusion exists as to the eligibility of firemen and their widows for pensions and that said confusion is affecting adversely the morale of firemen. Because of the urgent necessity of correcting this situation, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, it shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1957, No. 94, § 2: Feb. 26, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that the work of firemen is essential to the public peace, health and safety, and it is further found that a great deal of confusion exists as to the eligibility of firemen and their widows for pensions and that said confusion is affecting adversely the morale of firemen. Because of the urgent necessity of correcting this situation, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, it shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1957, No. 95, § 2: Feb. 26, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that the work of firemen is essential to the public peace, health and safety. Because of the urgent need for monthly pensions for firemen who become physically or mentally disabled, and this Act being necessary, therefore, for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1957, No. 265, § 2: Approved Mar. 13, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that the work of firemen is essential to the public peace, health and safety, and it is further found that a great deal of confusion exists as to the eligibility of firemen and their widows for pensions and that said confusion is affecting adversely the morale of firemen. Because of the urgent necessity of correcting this situation, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, it shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1963, No. 524, § 3: Mar. 19, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that the present minimum payment to retired firemen is inadequate to provide a decent minimum standard of living; that many retired firemen are totally dependent upon the benefits drawn from the firemen's relief and pension fund for their support; and, that immediate steps are needed to provide a more adequate minimum retirement benefit. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 156, § 3: Feb. 28, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that additional sources of investments for moneys on deposit in Firemen's Relief and Pension Funds are needed; and, that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to permit the investment of such funds in certificates of deposit and bank savings accounts in this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 24, § 10: Feb. 19, 1968. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that benefits under Firemen's Relief and Pension Funds are inadequate; that additional funds are necessary to properly finance the Firemen's Relief and Pension Funds in order that benefits to firemen and their dependents may be increased to meet the increasing cost of living and in order to assure that competent persons may be retained in the various Fire Departments to provide the fire protection that is essential to public health and safety in this State; and, that this Act will provide additional needed funds and will increase benefits under the Firemen's Relief and Pension Fund. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 486, § 4: Jan. 1, 1982.

Acts 1983, No. 406, § 4: Mar. 13, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the general intention of the General Assembly to provide for planned communities property owners associations to participate in the distribution of insurance premium tax revenues is not clear under the present law; that such moneys are distributed to city fire departments and fire protection districts; that planned community property owners associations need such revenues to assist in providing fire protection services for such communities, and that this Act is immediately necessary to authorize the planned community property owners associations to participate in the distribution of the insurance premium tax revenues. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 145, § 4: Feb. 18, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the exclusion of some survivors from eligibility for benefits has placed an extreme hardship on them and that this Act is necessary to provide needed relief. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 754, § 7: Apr. 3, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that current law provides for distribution of insurance tax turnback for the support of individual fire pension and relief funds, and for fire fighters covered under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, but that the certification process for the distribution of the tax is cumbersome and unclear, and that this Act is necessary to clarify the intent of existing law providing for the support of these retirement programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 992, § 7: Jan. 1, 1986.

Acts 1987, No. 389, § 6: Mar. 25, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current definition of “salary” is not being applied uniformly by the Boards of Trustees of the local Firemen's Pension and Relief Funds; that such varying application results in inequities to members of the pension system; that inequities in systems affecting firefighters could harm the public health, welfare and safety of this State. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 405, § 4: Mar. 25, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that an active member of a police pension fund should be allowed to serve on a local pension board when no retirant is available to serve; that local police pension boards of trustees are uncertain of their composition when no retirant is available to serve; and that this act is immediately necessary to end such uncertainty. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 152, § 7: Feb. 21, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that confusion exists regarding whether bank trust officers may serve as investment advisers to local police and fire pension funds; that it was never the intent that bank trust officers not be authorized to so act; that this Act clarifies the law to specifically authorize bank trust officers to serve as investment advisers to the local police and fire pension funds; and that this Act should be given effect immediately in order to eliminate the confusion. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 409, § 2, provided: “The provisions of this act shall be retroactive to January 1, 1988. The Board of Trustees of any fund hereunder is hereby directed to refund any accumulated contributions to the proper estate or heirs which would have been payable had the provisions of this act been in full force and effect since January 1, 1988 for any death occurring subsequent to that date.”

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 6: Mar. 20, 1992. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas meeting in the First Extraordinary Session of 1992 that an error was made in the legislative process of incorporating amendments into the language of Act 851 of 1991 and a scrivener's error was made in the course of writing the bill which eventually became Act 429 of 1991 and that the errors in language will create some confusion as to the meaning of Act 851 of 1991 and the effectiveness of Act 429 of 1991 and thereby affect the administration of justice in the municipal courts of those affected counties and the retirement benefits of those fireman's funds. Therefore, in order to correct the errant language and dispel any confusion as to the meaning of Act 851 of 1991 and to correct the scrivener's errors of Act 429 of 1991, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 546, § 8: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that allowing unused, accrued sick leave to be counted as salary for retirement purposes will enhance the municipal police officers' and fire fighters program for retirement; that police officers and fireman will thereby be motivated to work more productive hours with less absenteeism; and that the use of unused, accrued sick leave for retirement salaries is necessary for the most efficient and effective operation of the municipal police and fire departments of Arkansas. Therefore, in order to achieve the maximum use of municipal police officers' and fire fighters services, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1266, § 7: Jan. 1, 1995.

Acts 1997, No. 536, § 6: Mar. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the survivorship provisions of the firemen's pension and relief laws are not as liberal in their coverage as those for police pension funds; that this inequity is borne directly by the surviving children of the firefighters who have died serving their communities; and it is necessary to correct this inequity immediately and provide retroactive coverage for these children. Therefore, in order to relieve this inequity as soon as possible, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1457, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that this act revises the law concerning the Arkansas Police Officers' Deferred Option Plan and the Arkansas Fire Fighters' Deferred Retirement Option Plan; and that, for the effective administration of this act, its provisions should become effective on July 1, 1999. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1570, § 10: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that certain provisions of the law governing the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund need to be amended concerning the distribution and allocation of funds and that the effective administration of State government makes it necessary for these changes to begin immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1540, § 5: Apr. 12, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act must be implemented before the funds described herein are next disbursed in order to insure the fiscal well being of the beneficiaries of the Police and Fire Pension and Relief Funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1701, § 10: April 17, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of this act must be implemented before the funds described herein are next disbursed in order to insure the fiscal well-being of the beneficiaries of the Police and Fire Pension and Relief Funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1806, § 2, provided: “This act applies retroactively to authorize the board of trustees of the Local Police and Fire Retirement System or of any municipal firemen's pension and relief fund which will remain actuarially sound to allow a fire fighter who was disabled from an injury in the line of duty after January 1, 1983, but before January 1, 1987, to receive the benefit of sixty-five percent (65%) of the salary attached to his rank, except that benefit payments shall not be made retroactive to the effective date of the fire fighter's disability.”

Acts 2001, No. 1806, § 4: Apr. 19, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain disabled individuals under a firemen's pension and relief fund were injured in the line of duty before January 1, 1987; that this has worked a financial hardship and an inequity on individuals who were injured before the benefit was given to those fire fighters after January 1, 1987; and that certain individuals who were never granted benefits under this provision of law should have those benefits restored as soon as possible and to have this act applied retroactively to those individuals. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003, No. 1797, § 7: Apr. 23, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that premium tax distribution formula is directing state revenues to areas without the need for priority fire and police protection; that police and fire protection services are of extreme importance in the protection of property values and individual lives; that the distribution of premium tax revenues to the areas of the highest need is a top priority; that implementation of a revised distribution formula must be implemented before the normal time for the effectiveness of other laws; and that this act needs to be immediately effective to fulfill that priority. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 614, § 2: Mar. 28, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that surviving spouses of firefighters killed while on duty lose retirement benefits upon any remarriage and should be able to have retirement benefits restored, upon application to their fund’s board of trustees, and also be eligible for benefit increases granted during the interim between their benefit termination and restoration, subject to the board of trustees' discretion; and that this act is immediately necessary for the protection of these surviving spouses of firefighters. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1201, § 9: Apr. 7, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the statutes relating to payments from the local pension and relief funds need amending in order for the investments of the assets in the local pension and relief funds to be consistent with the practicalities of the market. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 556, § 6: Mar. 22, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board is in place to provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas, that the statutes need amending to account for changes in the economy, and that these citizens need to be immediately covered by these changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 41, § 37: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-11-801. Board of trustees — Members.

The board of trustees of every firemen's relief and pension fund established in a city, incorporated town, or duly qualified fire protection district under this subchapter shall be composed of the following:

The chief executive, who shall serve as chair of the board;

The city or district clerk or recorder, who shall serve as secretary of the board;

The fire chief or, if the fire chief is not a member of the fund, the highest ranking member of the fire department who is a member and who is willing to serve, or, if there is no active member of the fire department, a retired member of the fire department; and

Four (4) active or retired members of the pension fund.

As used in this section, “member” includes an active or retired member of the fund but does not include a beneficiary of the fund.

The board thus created shall provide for the disbursement of the firemen's relief and pension fund and shall designate its beneficiaries as directed in this act.

The active and retired members shall elect the member trustees by secret written ballot in May of each year by a method to be determined by the board.

All member trustees shall serve two-year terms without compensation.

The board may make all rules needful for its guidance to implement the provisions regarding board composition.

The chief executive in the cities, incorporated towns, or fire protection districts shall be the chair, the city or town clerk or recorder or clerk of the fire protection district shall be ex officio secretary, and the city, town, or fire protection district treasurer shall be ex officio treasurer of the board of trustees during his or her respective term of office as the official of the city, incorporated town, or fire protection district.

The secretary and treasurer of each board of trustees shall report annually, at the same time annual reports are required as clerk, recorder, or treasurer, the precise status of the firemen's relief and pension fund, showing all receipts and disbursements on account with a full and complete list of all beneficiaries of the fund and the amount paid each beneficiary.

Each member of the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund who receives gifts or other compensation that in total exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), including, but not limited to, trips and meals, from current or potential investment advisors or managers of the firemen's relief and pension fund shall prepare an annual statement listing:

Each item received;

The estimated value of each item; and

From whom each item was received.

Each member of the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund shall attest by written affidavit that the member's annual statement is true and current to the best of his or her knowledge.

An annual statement and affidavit from each board member shall be collected by the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund or the municipal treasurer.

One (1) copy of the statement and affidavit shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

A second copy of each statement and affidavit shall be retained on file by the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund or the municipal treasurer and shall be available for review by any plan participant.

As part of the annual report to the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, the chair of the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund for each plan shall certify that the statements and affidavits as described in this subsection have been completed and appropriately filed.

Each plan's annual report shall not be considered complete without this certification.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 7737, 7738; Acts 1943, No. 167, § 1; 1957, No. 326, §§ 1, 2; 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 24, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 927, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-2201, 19-2202; Acts 1987, No. 405, § 1; 1989, No. 527, § 1; 1991, No. 770, § 1; 2005, No. 2094, § 4; 2009, No. 260, § 2; 2011, No. 556, § 5; 2013, No. 1134, § 4; 2017, No. 126, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “that in total exceed one hundred dollars ($100)” in (j)(1).

The 2011 amendment added (a)(4)(B); deleted former (c) and (f) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in (c), inserted “active and,” substituted “member trustees” for “retired member or members,” and deleted “with the member or members to be chosen in alternate years” following “each year”; and added “without compensation” at the end of (d).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a)(4)(B).

The 2017 amendment inserted “or, if there is no active member of the fire department, a retired member of the fire department” in (a)(3).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1921, No. 491, codified as §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-810 [repealed], 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, 24-11-821 [repealed].

24-11-802. Board of trustees — Proceedings.

Meetings of the board of trustees may be called by the chair or by a majority of the members in a manner established by the board.

The board shall issue orders signed by the chair and secretary to the persons entitled thereto for the amount of money ordered paid to the persons from the fund by the board. The order shall state for what purpose the payment is made.

The board shall keep a record of its proceedings. The record shall be a public record.

At each meeting, the board shall send to the treasurer of the city or town a written or printed list of all persons entitled to payment from the fund provided for in this subchapter.

This list shall state the amount of the payment and for what granted and shall be certified to and signed by the chair and secretary of the board and attested under oath.

The treasurer of the city or town shall thereupon enter a copy of the list upon the book to be kept for that purpose. The book shall be known as “The Firemen's Relief and Pension Fund Book”.

The board shall direct payment of the amounts named therein to the persons entitled thereto out of those funds.

A majority of all the members of the board shall constitute a quorum and shall have the power to transact business.

Money belonging to the fund shall not be disbursed for any purpose without a vote of a majority of all the members of the board of trustees, which shall be taken by the “yeas” and “nays”.

The vote of each member so voting shall be entered upon the proceedings of the board.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 7739; Acts 1981, No. 57, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2203; Acts 1993, No. 201, § 1; 1995, No. 514, §§ 4-6; 2013, No. 41, § 22.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “chair” for “president” in the first sentence of (b) and in (d)(2); and in (g)(1), deleted “No” at the beginning and substituted “shall not” for “shall ever.”

24-11-803. Board of trustees — Powers.

In addition to the other powers granted in this subchapter, the board of trustees of a firemen's relief and pension fund shall have the power to:

Compel witnesses to attend and testify before it upon all matters connected with the operation of this act and in the same manner as provided by law for the taking of testimony before a notary public.

The chair or any member of the board may administer oaths to the witnesses;

Provide for the payment from the fund of all its necessary expenses.

However, no compensation shall be paid to any member of the board for any duties performed under this act; and

Make all rules needful for compliance with the provisions of this act.

The board shall have the power to accept and disburse according to the provisions of this act any and all sums which may come into its hands through appropriation, gift, or devise.

Members of the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund of incorporated cities and towns in Arkansas shall have the power, in their discretion, to expend moneys from the firemen's relief and pension fund for the purpose of paying premiums and purchasing group insurance covering the members of the fire departments of the cities and towns against accidental injury or death occurring within the line of duty of the firefighters.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, §§ 11, 14; Pope's Dig., §§ 7747, 7750; Acts 1947, No. 187, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-2211, 19-2222, 19-2229; Acts 2013, No. 41, § 23.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “The chair” for “Its president” in (a)(1)(B); deleted “and printing” at the end of (a)(2)(A); deleted “or emoluments” following “compensation” in (a)(2)(B); and in (a)(3), deleted “and regulations” following “rules” and substituted “compliance” for “its guidance in conformity.”

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-11-801.